Washington statutes.
RCW 43.332.005

Findings—Purpose.

(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) The expansion of international trade is vital to the overall growth of Washington's economy;

(b) On a per capita basis, Washington state is the most international trade dependent state in the nation;

(c) The North American free trade agreement (NAFTA) and the general agreement on tariffs and trade (GATT) highlight the increased importance of international trade opportunities to the United States and the state of Washington;

(d) The passage of NAFTA and GATT will have a major impact on the state's agriculture, aerospace, computer software, and textiles and apparel sectors;

(e) There is a need to strengthen and coordinate the state's activities in promoting and developing its agricultural, manufacturing, and service industries overseas, especially for small and medium-sized businesses, and minority and women-owned business enterprises; and

(f) The importance of having a coherent vision for advancing Washington state's interest in the global economy has rarely been so consequential as it is now.

(2) The legislature declares that the purpose of the office of the Washington state trade representative is to:

(a) Strengthen and expand the state's activities in marketing its goods and services overseas;

(b) Review and analyze proposed international trade agreements to assess their impact on goods and services produced by Washington businesses; and

(c) Inform the legislature about ongoing trade negotiations, trade development, and the possible impacts on Washington's economy.

[ 2003 c 346 s 1; 1995 c 350 s 1.]